src/morphology/stems/pronouns.lexc
! Divvun & Giellatekno - open source grammars for Sámi and other languages
! Copyright © 2000-2010 The University of Tromsø & the Norwegian Sámi Parliament
! http://giellatekno.uit.no & http://divvun.no
!
! This program is free software; you can redistribute and/or modify
! this file under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
! (at your option) any later version. The GNU General Public License
! is found at http://www.gnu.org/licenses/gpl.html. It is
! also available in the file $GTHOME/LICENSE.txt.
!
! Other licensing options are available upon request, please contact
! giellatekno@hum.uit.no or feedback@divvun.no

!! !!!Pronouns


!! Pointing to all the pronominal subgroups

LEXICON Pronoun !!= * @CODE@
Personal ;      !!= * @CODE@
Demonstrative ; !!= * @CODE@
Reflexive ;     !!= * @CODE@
Interrogative ; !!= * @CODE@
! Reciprocal ;
! Relative ;
! Indefinite ;


!! !!Personal pronouns


!! Splitting according to person

LEXICON Personal           !!= * @CODE@
mon+Pron+Pers:m perspron ; !!= * @CODE@
ton+Pron+Pers:t perspron ; !!= * @CODE@
son+Pron+Pers:s perspron ; !!= * @CODE@

LEXICON perspron
:u	    perspronoblsg ;
:uän    persprondu ;
:ån	    persprondu ;
:i	    perspronpl ;
+Nom+Sg:on	K ;
+Nom+Du:ååna	K ;
+Loc+Pl:eeʹst	K ;

LEXICON perspronoblsg 
+Gen+Sg:u	      K ;
+Acc+Sg:u	      K ;
+Ill+Sg:ʹnne	      K ;
+Loc+Sg:ʹst	      K ;
+Com+Sg:ʹin	      K ;
+Abe+Sg:utää	      K ;
+Ess+Sg:uʹnen	      K ;
+Par+Sg:uʹđed	      K ;



LEXICON persprondu
+Nom+Du:a		K ;
+Gen+Du:nai	      K ;
+Acc+Du:naid	      K ;
+Ill+Du:naid	      K ;
+Loc+Du:nast	      K ;
+Com+Du:nain	      K ;
+Abe+Du:naitää	      K ;
+Ess+Du:nan	      K ;

LEXICON perspronpl
+Nom+Pl:j		K ;
+Gen+Pl:ʹj	      K ;
+Acc+Pl:ʹjjid	      K ;
+Ill+Pl:ʹjjid	      K ;
+Loc+Pl:ʹjjst	      K ;
+Com+Pl:ʹjjivuiʹm     K ;
+Abe+Pl:ʹjjitää	      K ;




!! !!Demonstrative pronouns


LEXICON Demonstrative !!= * @CODE@
tät+Pron+Dem:tä		SHORTDEM ;
tut+Pron+Dem:tu		SHORTDEM ;
tõt+Pron+Dem:tõ		SHORTDEM ;
tät+Pron+Dem:tää	LONGDEM ;
tut+Pron+Dem:tuu	LONGDEM ;
tõt+Pron+Dem:t		TOTDEM ;
tiet-aa:tie		TIET-AA ;

LEXICON SHORTDEM !!= * @CODE@
+Nom+Sg:t	K ;
+Acc+Sg:n	K ;
+Gen+Sg:n	K ;
+Loc+Sg:ʹst	K ;
+Com+Sg:in	K ;
+Abe+Sg:ntää	K ;
+Nom+Pl:k	K ;
+Acc+Pl:id	K ;
+Gen+Pl:i	K ;
+Ill+Pl:id	K ;
+Loc+Pl:in	K ;
+Com+Pl:ivuim	K ;
+Abe+Pl:itää	K ;

LEXICON LONGDEM !!= * @CODE@
+Ill+Sg:zz	K ;
+Ess+Sg:ʹđen	K ;
+Par+Sg:đ	K ;
+Par+Sg:ʹđed	K ;

LEXICON TOTDEM  !!= * @CODE@
+Ill+Sg:õõzz	K ;
+Ess+Sg:ââʹđen	K ;
+Par+Sg:ââʹđ	K ;
+Par+Sg:ââʹđed	K ;
+Nom+Pl:õõk	K ;
+Loc+Pl:âin	K ;

LEXICON TIET-AA !!= * @CODE@
+Nom+Sg:t	-AA ;
+Acc+Sg:n	-AA ;
+Gen+Sg:n	-AA ;
+Ill+Sg:zz	-AA ;
+Loc+Sg:ʹst	-AA ;
+Com+Sg:in	-AA ;
+Nom+Pl:k	-AA ;
+Acc+Pl:id	-AA ;
+Gen+Pl:i	-AA ;
+Ill+Pl:id	-AA ;
+Com+Pl:i-aavuim    K ;

LEXICON -AA !!= * @CODE@
:-aa K ;



!! !!Reflexive pronouns


LEXICON Reflexive !!= * @CODE@
jiõčč+Pron+Refl+Gen+Sg3:jiijjâs	K ;
jiõčč+Pron+Refl+Acc+Sg3:jiijjâs	K ;
jiõčč+Pron+Refl+Gen+Pl1:jieʹččen	K ;
jiõčč+Pron+Refl+Acc+Pl1:jieʹččen	K ;
jiõčč+Pron+Refl+Gen:jiõčč		GA-I ;
jiõčč+Pron+Refl+Acc:jiõčč		GA-I ;
jiõčč+Pron+Refl+Gen:jiičč		GA-I ;
jiõčč+Pron+Refl+Acc:jiičč		GA-I ;
jiõčč+Pron+Refl+Gen:jiijj		GA-II ;
jiõčč+Pron+Refl+Acc:jiijj		GA-II ;
jiõčč+Pron+Refl+Gen:jiiʹjj		GA-II ;
jiõčč+Pron+Refl+Acc:jiiʹjj		GA-II ;
jiõčč+Pron+Refl+Ill:jiõccs		ILEPX ;
jiõčč+Pron+Refl+Ill:jiccs		ILEPX ;
jiõčč+Pron+Refl+Loc:jijst		ILEPX ;
jiõčč+Pron+Refl+Loc:jiijst		LOCPX ;
jiõčč+Pron+Refl+Ess:jiõččn		ILEPX ;
jiõčč+Pron+Refl+Com:jijj		COMPX ;


LEXICON GA-I !!= * @CODE@
+Sǧ:an K ;
+Pl1:ân K ;

LEXICON GA-II !!= * @CODE@
+Sǥ:ad K ;
+Pl1:ân K ;
+Pl2:âd K ;
+Pl3:âz K ;

LEXICON ILEPX !!= * @CODE@
ROBLSGPX ;
ROBLPLPX ;

LEXICON LOCPX !!= * @CODE@
+Sg1:an	K ;
ROBLPLPX ;

LEXICON COMPX !!= * @CODE@
ROBLSGPX ;
RCOMPLPX ;

LEXICON ROBLSGPX !!= * @CODE@
+Sg1:an K ;
+Sg2:ad K ;
+Sg3:es K ;

LEXICON ROBLPLPX !!= * @CODE@
+Pl1:een K ;
+Pl2:eed K ;
+Pl3:eez K ;

LEXICON RCOMPLPX !!= * @CODE@
+Pl1:eenvuim K ;
+Pl2:eedvuim K ;
+Pl3:eezvuim K ;




!! !!Interrogative pronouns


LEXICON Interrogative !!= * @CODE@
mii+Pron+Interr:m	MK ; !!= * @CODE@
ǩii+Pron+Interr:ǩ	MK ; !!= * @CODE@
mii+Pron+Interr:mõõ	MK-long ;
ǩii+Pron+Interr:ǩeä	MK-long ;
mii+Pron+Interr:mõ	MK-short ;
ǩii+Pron+Interr:ǩeä	MK-short ;
mii+Pron+Interr:mââ	MK-low ;
ǩii+Pron+Interr:ǩeä	MK-low ;

LEXICON MK !!= * @CODE@
+Nom+Sg:ii	K ;

LEXICON MK-long !!= * @CODE@
+Acc+Sg:n	K ;
+Gen+Sg:n	K ;
+Ill+Sg:zz	K ;
+Nom+Pl:k	K ;

LEXICON MK-short !!= * @CODE@
+Com+Sg:ʹin	K ;
+Abe+Sg:ntää	K ;

LEXICON MK-low !!= * @CODE@
+Ess+Sg:ʹđen	K ;
+Par+Sg:ʹđ	K ;
+Par+Sg:ʹđed	K ;
+Com+Pl:ivuiʹm	K ;
+Abe+Pl:itää	K ;
